Hawaii statutes.
[PART V.]
PIGEONS

[§142-101] Definitions. As used in
this part, unless the context otherwise provides:

"Carrier pigeon" means homing and
racing pigeons which are banded on the leg with an identification leg band.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Identification leg band" means the
band placed around the pigeon's leg identifying the owner by name or initials
or containing numbers or letters or a combination thereof.

"Pigeon" includes all carrier and
show birds but does not pertain to birds raised for food or for similar
commercial purposes.

"Racing pigeon" means any pigeon
whose leg band identification is registered with any county, state, national,
or international pigeon racing organization.

"Show pigeon" means any pigeon
intended for show purposes which bears an identification leg band. [L 1989, c
9, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next